Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10D-211.5] Other groups; limits. Group
life insurance offered to a Hawaii resident under a group life insurance policy
issued to a group, other than a group described in sections 431:10D-202 through
431:10D-211, shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1) No group life insurance policy shall be delivered
in this State unless the commissioner finds that:

(A) The issuance of the group life insurance
policy is not contrary to the best interest of the public;

(B) The issuance of the group life insurance
policy would result in economies of acquisition or administration; and

(C) The benefits of the group life insurance
policy are reasonable in relation to the premium charged;

(2) No group life insurance coverage may be offered
in this State, pursuant to this section, by an insurer under a group life
insurance policy issued in another state, unless:

(A) The commissioner finds that the
requirements of paragraph (1) have been met; or

(B) The issuing state has requirements
substantially similar to those contained in paragraph (1) and has determined
that those requirements have been met;

(3) The premium for a group life insurance policy
issued pursuant to this section shall be paid by the policyholder, by covered
persons, or both; and

(4) An insurer may exclude from coverage or limit the
coverage on any person as to whom evidence of individual insurability is not
satisfactory to the insurer under a group life insurance policy issued pursuant
to this section. [L 2010, c 32, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next